src/fst/affixes/verb_inner_affixes.lexc
LEXICON isis-AFF-NoPrefix
! CHECK: 3S form requires confirmation in additional documentation
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìsis  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@isís  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@sis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@ìsaà  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@ìsiì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@ìsiì #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìsas2 #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìs    #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìs    #;

LEXICON isis-AFF-InnerPrefix
! Same forms as sis-AFF-InnerPrefix; reuse those definitions here.
                                             sis-AFF-InnerPrefix;

LEXICON isis-AFF-OuterPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìsis  #; ! CHECK: morphophonology works? 
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìsís  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìs    #; ! CHECK: morphophonology works? 
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@ìsaà  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@ìsiì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@ìsiì #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìsas2 #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìs    #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìs    #;


LEXICON isii-AFF-NoPrefix
! Two 3P, 4 forms are attested (e.g., gììdùn, gìsdùn '3P got a swelling')
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìsis  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìsíí  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìì    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@ìsaà  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@ìsiì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@ìsiì #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìsas2 #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìì    #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìs    #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìì    #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìs    #;

LEXICON isii-AFF-InnerPrefix
! Note 3SG/3PL/4SG ìì- in this paradigm, compared to si-(I)PFV 3SG/4PL/4SG ìs-.
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìsis  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@as    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìsí   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìì    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@ìsaà  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@ìsiì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@ìsiì #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìsas2 #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìì    #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìì    #;

LEXICON isii-AFF-OuterPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìsis  #; ! CHECK: morphophonology OK?
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìsíí  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìì    #; ! CHECK: morphophonology OK?
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@ìsaà  #; ! CHECK: morphophonology O? 
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@ìsiì   #; ! CHECK: morphophonology OK? 
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@ìsiì #; ! CHECK: morphophonology ? 
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìsas2 #; ! CHECK: morphophonology OK? 
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìì    #; 
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìì    #; 
